Missouri, session 2026, SB1255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.311, to read as
follows:
67.311. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "County", any county with more than seven hundred
thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants;
(2) "Mobile food unit", a vehicle-mounted food service
establishment, designed to be readily movable, that returns
to a commissary daily for clean-up and service;
(3) "Municipality", any city, town, or village located
wholly or partially within a county.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any license or permit issued by a county to a
mobile food unit or operator shall be sufficient to allow
such mobile food unit or operator to operate in all
municipalities within such county. Any permitting
requirement imposed by a municipality that is more strict
than the permitting requirements imposed by a county shall
be null and void.

SB 1255 2
3. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to prohibit or limit any health or food sanitation
regulations authorized in chapter 196 or any other provision
of law.
✓